North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-38 Income Tax
57-38-01.20.
Credit for expenses of caring for certain family members.

An individual is entitled to a credit against the tax imposed under section 57-38-30.3 in the amount of qualified care expenses under this section paid by the individual for the care of a qualifying family member during the taxable year.

A qualifying family member is an individual who has taxable income of twenty thousand dollars or less or a married individual with taxable income of thirty-five thousand dollars or less, including that of the individual’s spouse, for the taxable year. A qualifying family member must be related to the taxpayer by blood or marriage and either sixty-five years of age or older or is disabled as defined under title XVI of the federal Social Security Act.

Qualified care expenses include payments by the taxpayer for home health agency services, companionship services, personal care attendant services, homemaker services, adult day care, respite care, and other expenses that are deductible medical expenses under the Internal Revenue Code. A qualified care expense must be:

Provided to or for the benefit of the qualifying family member or to assist the taxpayer in caring for the qualifying family member;

Provided by an organization or individual not related to the taxpayer or the qualifying family member; and

Not compensated for by insurance or federal or state assistance programs.

For purposes of this subsection, “companionship services” means services that provide fellowship, care, and protection for individuals who, because of advanced age or physical or mental disabilities, cannot care for their own needs. Those services may include household work related to the care of the aged or disabled person, including meal preparation, bed making, washing of clothes, and other similar services, and may include the performance of general household work if that work does not exceed twenty percent of the total weekly hours worked. “Companionship services” does not include services relating to the care and protection of the aged or disabled which require and are performed by trained personnel, including a registered or practical nurse, and does not include services of individuals who provide care and protection for infants and young children who are not physically or mentally disabled.

The percentage amount of credit allowable under this section is:

For a taxpayer whose taxable income does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars, or thirty-five thousand dollars for a joint return, thirty percent of qualified elderly care expenses; or

For a taxpayer whose taxable income exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars, or thirty-five thousand dollars for a joint return, the greater of:

Twenty percent of qualified elderly care expenses; or

Thirty percent of qualified elderly care expenses, minus one percent of those expenses for each two thousand dollars or fraction of two thousand dollars by which the taxable income of the taxpayer for the taxable year exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars, or thirty-five thousand dollars for a joint return.

The dollar amount of credit allowable under this section is:

Reduced by one dollar for each dollar of the taxable income over fifty thousand dollars for a taxpayer whose taxable income exceeds fifty thousand dollars, or for a joint return, reduced by one dollar for each dollar of the taxable income over seventy thousand dollars for taxpayers whose taxable income exceeds seventy thousand dollars; and

Limited to two thousand dollars per qualifying family member in a taxable year and to four thousand dollars total for two or more qualifying family members in a taxable year.

A deduction or credit is not allowed under any other provision of this chapter with respect to any amount for which a credit is allowed under this section. The credit allowed under this section may not be claimed as a carryback or carryforward and may not be refunded if the taxpayer has no tax liability.

In the case of a married individual filing a separate return, the percentage amount of credit under subsection 4 and the dollar amount of credit under subsection 5 are limited to one-half of the amounts indicated in those subsections.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 492, § 1; 1999, ch. 511, § 1; 2007, ch. 517, § 1; 2009, ch. 545, § 14.

Note.

Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act referenced in this section is compiled at 42 USCS § 1381 et seq.

57-38-01.21.
Charitable gifts, planned gifts, and qualified endowments credit — Definitions.

For purposes of this section:

“Permanent, irrevocable fund” means a fund comprising cash, securities, mutual funds, or other investment assets established for a specific charitable, religious, educational, or eleemosynary purpose and invested for the production or growth of income, or both, which may either be added to principal or expended.

“Planned gift” means an irrevocable charitable gift to a North Dakota qualified nonprofit organization or qualified endowment held by or for a North Dakota qualified nonprofit organization, when the charitable gift uses any of the following techniques that are authorized under the Internal Revenue Code:

Charitable remainder unitrusts, as defined by 26 U.S.C. 664;

Charitable remainder annuity trusts, as defined by 26 U.S.C. 664;

Pooled income fund trusts, as defined by 26 U.S.C. 642(c)(5);

Charitable lead unitrusts qualifying under 26 U.S.C. 170(f)(2)(B);

Charitable lead annuity trusts qualifying under 26 U.S.C. 170(f)(2)(B);

Charitable gift annuities undertaken pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 1011(b);

Deferred charitable gift annuities undertaken pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 1011(b);

Charitable life estate agreements qualifying under 26 U.S.C. 170(f)(3)(B); or

Paid-up life insurance policies meeting the requirements of 26 U.S.C. 170.

“Qualified endowment” means a permanent, irrevocable fund held by:

A North Dakota incorporated or established organization that is:

A qualified nonprofit organization; or

A bank or trust company holding the fund on behalf of a qualified nonprofit organization; or

An organization incorporated or established in a state bordering North Dakota that is:

A tax-exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c) to which contributions qualify for federal charitable income tax deductions which was incorporated or established for the support and benefit of a hospital, nursing home, or medical center, or a facility providing any combination of those services, which is located outside North Dakota but within five miles of a North Dakota city of five thousand or more population in which there is no hospital; or

A bank or trust company holding the fund on behalf of an organization that meets the conditions of subparagraph a.

“Qualified nonprofit organization” means a North Dakota incorporated or established tax-exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c) to which contributions qualify for federal charitable income tax deductions with an established business presence or situs in North Dakota.

An individual is allowed a tax credit against the tax imposed by section 57-38-30.3 in an amount equal to forty percent of the present value of the aggregate amount of the charitable gift portion of planned gifts made by the taxpayer during the taxable year to a qualified nonprofit organization or qualified endowment. The maximum credit that may be claimed under this subsection for planned gifts made in a taxable year is ten thousand dollars for an individual, or twenty thousand dollars for married individuals filing a joint return. The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the taxpayer’s income tax liability.

An individual is allowed a tax credit against the tax imposed by section 57-38-30.3 for making a charitable gift to a qualified endowment. The credit is equal to forty percent of the charitable gift. If an individual makes a single charitable gift to a qualified endowment, the charitable gift must be five thousand dollars or more to qualify for the credit. If an individual makes more than one charitable gift to the same qualified endowment, the aggregate amount of the charitable gifts made to that qualified endowment must be five thousand dollars or more to qualify for the credit. The maximum credit that may be claimed under this subsection for charitable gifts made in a taxable year is ten thousand dollars for an individual or twenty thousand dollars for married individuals filing a joint return. The tax credit allowed under this section may not exceed the taxpayer’s income tax liability.

A corporation is allowed a tax credit against the tax imposed by section 57-38-30 in an amount equal to forty percent of a charitable gift to a qualified endowment. The maximum credit that may be claimed by a corporation under this subsection for charitable gifts made in a taxable year is ten thousand dollars. The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the corporate taxpayer’s income tax liability.

An estate or trust is allowed a tax credit in an amount equal to forty percent of a charitable gift to a qualified endowment. The maximum credit that may be claimed under this subsection for charitable gifts made in a taxable year is ten thousand dollars. The allowable credit must be apportioned to the estate or trust and to its beneficiaries on the basis of the income of the estate or trust allocable to each, and the beneficiaries may claim their share of the credit against the tax imposed by section 57-38-30 or 57-38-30.3. A beneficiary may claim the credit only in the beneficiary’s taxable year in which the taxable year of the estate or trust ends. Subsections 6 and 7 apply to the estate or trust and its beneficiaries with respect to their respective shares of the apportioned credit.

A passthrough entity is entitled to a credit in an amount equal to forty percent of a charitable gift to a qualified endowment by the entity during the taxable year. The maximum credit that may be claimed by the entity under this subsection for charitable gifts made in a taxable year is ten thousand dollars. The credit determined at the entity level must be passed through to the partners, shareholders, or members in the same proportion that the charitable contributions attributable to the charitable gifts under this section are distributed to the partners, shareholders, or members. The partner, shareholder, or member may claim the credit only in the partner’s, shareholder’s, or member’s taxable year in which the taxable year of the passthrough entity ends. Subsections 6 and 7 apply to the partner, shareholder, or member.

The amount of the charitable gift upon which an allowable credit is computed must be added to federal taxable income in computing North Dakota taxable income in any taxable year in which the charitable gift reduces federal taxable income, but only to the extent that the charitable gift reduced federal taxable income.

The unused portion of a credit under this section may be carried forward for up to three taxable years.

If a charitable gift for which a credit was claimed is recovered by the taxpayer, an amount equal to the credit claimed in all taxable years must be added to the tax due on the income tax return filed for the taxable year in which the recovery occurs. For purposes of subsection 4, this subsection applies if the estate or trust recovers the charitable gift and the estate or trust and its beneficiaries are liable for the additional tax due with respect to their respective shares of the apportioned credit. For purposes of subsection 5, this subsection applies if the partnership, subchapter S corporation, or limited liability company recovers the charitable gift, and the partner, shareholder, or member is liable for the additional tax due.

A charitable gift used as the basis for a credit claimed under this section may not be used as the basis for the claim of a credit under any other provision of this chapter.

“Planned gift” does not include a charitable gift using a charitable remainder unitrust or charitable remainder annuity trust unless the agreement provides that the trust may not terminate and beneficiaries’ interest in the trust may not be assigned or contributed to the qualified nonprofit organization or qualified endowment sooner than the earlier of the date of death of the beneficiaries or five years from the date of the planned gift.

“Planned gift” does not include a deferred charitable gift annuity unless the payment of the annuity is required to begin within the life expectancy of the annuitant or of the joint life expectancies of the annuitants, if more than one annuitant, as determined using the actuarial tables used by the internal revenue service in determining federal charitable income tax deductions on the date of the planned gift.

“Planned gift” does not include a charitable gift annuity or deferred charitable gift annuity unless the annuity agreement provides that the interest of the annuitant or annuitants in the gift annuity may not be assigned to the qualified nonprofit organization or qualified endowment sooner than the earlier of the date of death of the annuitant or annuitants or five years after the date of the planned gift.

“Planned gift” does not include a charitable gift annuity or deferred charitable gift annuity unless the annuity is a qualified charitable gift annuity for federal income tax purposes.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 560, § 1; 2007, ch. 518, § 1; 2009, ch. 545, § 15; 2011, ch. 458, § 3; 2011, ch. 459, § 4; 2013, ch. 443, § 16; 2015, ch. 444, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

57-38-01.22.
Income tax credit for blending of biodiesel fuel or green diesel fuel.

A fuel supplier licensed pursuant to section 57-43.2-05 who blends biodiesel fuel or green diesel fuel in this state is entitled to a credit against tax liability determined under section 57-38-30 or 57-38-30.3 in the amount of five cents per gallon [3.79 liters] of biodiesel fuel or green diesel fuel of at least five percent blend, otherwise known as B5. For purposes of this section, “biodiesel” and “green diesel” mean fuel as defined in section 57-43.2-01. The credit under this section may not exceed the taxpayer’s liability as determined under this chapter for the taxable year and each year’s unused credit amount may be carried forward for up to five taxable years.

A passthrough entity entitled to the credit under this section must be considered to be the taxpayer for purposes of this section, and the amount of the credit allowed must be determined at the passthrough entity level. The amount of the total credit determined at the entity level must be passed through to the partners, shareholders, or members in proportion to their respective interests in the passthrough entity.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 94, § 2; 2009, ch. 545, § 16; 2011, ch. 460, § 8; 2013, ch. 443, § 17.

57-38-01.23.
Income tax credit for biodiesel or green diesel sales equipment costs.

A seller of biodiesel fuel or green diesel fuel is entitled to a credit against tax liability determined under section 57-38-30 or 57-38-30.3 in the amount of ten percent per year for five years of the biodiesel or green diesel fuel seller’s direct costs incurred to adapt or add equipment to a facility, licensed under section 57-43.2-05, to enable the facility to sell diesel fuel containing at least two percent biodiesel fuel or green diesel fuel by volume. For purposes of this section, “biodiesel fuel” and “green diesel fuel” mean fuel as defined in section 57-43.2-01. The credit under this section may not exceed a taxpayer’s liability as determined under this chapter for the taxable year and each year’s unused credit amount may be carried forward for up to five taxable years. A biodiesel or green diesel fuel seller is limited to fifty thousand dollars in the cumulative amount of credits under this section for all taxable years. A biodiesel or green diesel fuel seller may not claim a credit under this section for any taxable year before the taxable year in which the facility begins selling biodiesel or green diesel fuel containing at least two percent biodiesel or green diesel fuel by volume, but eligible costs incurred before the taxable year sales begin may be claimed for purposes of the credit under this section for taxable years on or after the taxable year sales of biodiesel or green diesel fuel begin.

A passthrough entity entitled to the credit under this section must be considered to be the taxpayer for purposes of this section, and the amount of the credit allowed must be determined at the passthrough entity level. The amount of the total credit determined at the entity level must be passed through to the partners, shareholders, or members in proportion to their respective interests in the passthrough entity.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 94, § 3; 2009, ch. 545, § 17; 2011, ch. 460, § 9; 2013, ch. 443, § 18.

57-38-01.24.
Internship employment tax credit.

A taxpayer that is an employer within this state is entitled to a credit as determined under this section against state income tax liability under section 57-38-30 or 57-38-30.3 for qualified compensation paid to an intern employed in this state by the taxpayer. To qualify for the credit under this section, the internship program must meet the following qualifications:

The intern must be an enrolled student in an institution of higher education or vocational technical education program who is seeking a degree or a certification of completion in a major field of study closely related to the work experience performed for the taxpayer;

The internship must be taken for academic credit or count toward the completion of a vocational technical education program;

The intern must be supervised and evaluated by the taxpayer; and

The internship position must be located in this state.

The amount of the credit to which a taxpayer is entitled is ten percent of the stipend or salary paid to a college intern employed by the taxpayer. A taxpayer may not receive more than three thousand dollars in total credits under this section for all taxable years combined.

The tax credit under this section applies to a stipend or salary for not more than five interns employed at the same time.

A passthrough entity that is entitled to the credit under this section must be considered to be the taxpayer for purposes of calculating the credit. The amount of the allowable credit must be determined at the passthrough entity level. The total credit determined at the entity level must be passed through to the partners, shareholders, or members in proportion to their respective interests in the passthrough entity.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 18, § 44; 2009, ch. 545, § 18; 2013, ch. 443, § 19.

57-38-01.25.
Workforce recruitment credit for hard-to-fill employment positions.

A taxpayer that is an employer in this state is entitled to a credit as determined under this section against state income tax liability under section 57-38-30 or 57-38-30.3 for costs the taxpayer incurred during the tax year to recruit and hire employees for hard-to-fill employment positions within this state for which the annual salary for the position meets or exceeds the state average wage.

The amount of the credit to which a taxpayer is entitled is five percent of the salary paid for the first twelve consecutive months to the employee hired for the hard-to-fill employment position. To qualify for the credit under this section, the employee must be employed by the taxpayer in the hard-to-fill employment position for twelve consecutive months.

For purposes of this section:

“Extraordinary recruitment methods” means using all of the following:

A person with the exclusive business purpose of recruiting employees and for which a fee is charged by that recruiter.

An advertisement in a professional trade journal, magazine, or other publication, the main emphasis of which is providing information to a particular trade or profession.

A website, the sole purpose of which is to recruit employees and for which a fee is charged by the website.

Payment of a signing bonus, moving expenses, or nontypical fringe benefits.

“Hard-to-fill employment position” means a job that requires the employer to use extraordinary recruitment methods and for which the employer’s recruitment efforts for the specific position have been unsuccessful for six consecutive calendar months.

“State average wage” means one hundred twenty-five percent of the state average wage published annually by job service North Dakota and which is in effect at the time the employee is hired.

The taxpayer may claim the credit in the first tax year beginning after the employee hired for the hard-to-fill position has completed the employee’s first twelve consecutive months of employment in the hard-to-fill position with the taxpayer.

The credit under this section may not exceed a taxpayer’s liability for the taxable year as determined under this chapter. Any amount of unused credit may be carried forward for up to four taxable years after the taxable year in which the credit could initially be claimed.

A passthrough entity that is entitled to the credit under this section must be considered to be the taxpayer for purposes of this section and the amount of the credit allowed must be determined at the passthrough entity level. The amount of the total credit determined at the passthrough entity level must be allowed to the partners, shareholders, or members in proportion to their respective interests in the passthrough entity.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 18, § 45; 2009, ch. 545, § 19; 2013, ch. 443, § 20.

57-38-01.26.
Angel fund investment tax credit. [Effective for investments made before July 1, 2017]

A taxpayer is entitled to a credit against state income tax liability under section 57-38-30 or 57-38-30.3 for an investment made prior to July 1, 2017, in an angel fund that is a domestic organization organized before July 1, 2017, under the laws of this state. The amount of the credit to which a taxpayer is entitled is forty-five percent of the amount remitted by the taxpayer to an angel fund during the taxable year. The aggregate annual credit for which a taxpayer may obtain a tax credit is not more than forty-five thousand dollars. The aggregate lifetime credits under this section that may be obtained by an individual, married couple, passthrough entity and its affiliates, or other taxpayer is five hundred thousand dollars. The investment used to calculate the credit under this section may not be used to calculate any other income tax deduction or credit allowed by law.

To be eligible for the credit, the investment must be at risk in the angel fund for at least three years. An investment made in a qualified business from the assets of a retirement plan is deemed to be the retirement plan participant’s investment for the purpose of this section if a separate account is maintained for the plan participant and the participant directly controls where the account assets are invested. Investments placed in escrow do not qualify for the credit. The credit must be claimed in the taxable year in which the investment in the angel fund was received by the angel fund. The credit allowed may not exceed the liability for tax under this chapter. If the amount of credit determined under this section exceeds the liability for tax under this chapter, the excess may be carried forward to each of the seven succeeding taxable years. A taxpayer claiming a credit under this section may not claim any credit available to the taxpayer as a result of an investment made by the angel fund in a qualified business under chapter 57-38.5 or 57-38.6.

An angel fund must:

Be a partnership, limited partnership, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited liability limited partnership, trust, or estate organized on a for-profit basis which is headquartered in this state.

Be organized for the purpose of investing in a portfolio of at least three primary sector companies that are early-stage and mid-stage private, nonpublicly traded enterprises with strong growth potential. For purposes of this section, an early-stage entity means an entity with annual revenues of up to two million dollars and a mid-stage entity means an entity with annual revenues over two million dollars not to exceed ten million dollars. Investments in real estate or real estate holding companies are not eligible investments by certified angel funds. Any angel fund certified before January 1, 2013, which has invested in real estate or a real estate holding company is not eligible for recertification.

Consist of at least six accredited investors as defined by securities and exchange commission regulation D, rule 501.

Not have more than twenty-five percent of its capitalized investment assets owned by an individual investor.

Have at least five hundred thousand dollars in commitments from accredited investors and that capital must be subject to call to be invested over an unspecified number of years to build a portfolio of investments in enterprises.

Be member-managed or a manager-managed limited liability company and the investor members or a designated board that includes investor members must make decisions as a group on which enterprises are worthy of investments.

Be certified as an angel fund that meets the requirements of this section by the department of commerce.

Be in compliance with the securities laws of this state.

Within thirty days after the date on which an investment in an angel fund is made, the angel fund shall file with the tax commissioner and provide to the investor completed forms prescribed by the tax commissioner which show as to each investment in the angel fund the following:

The name, address, and social security number or federal employer identification number of the taxpayer or passthrough entity that made the investment;

The dollar amount remitted by the taxpayer or passthrough entity; and

The date the payment was received by the angel fund for the investment.

Within thirty days after the end of a calendar year, the angel fund shall file with the tax commissioner a report showing the name and principal place of business of each enterprise in which the angel fund has an investment and the amount of the investment.

The tax commissioner may disclose to the legislative management the reported information described under paragraphs 2 and 3 of subdivision i of subsection 3 and the reported information described under subdivision j of subsection 3.

Angel fund investors may be actively involved in the enterprises in which the angel fund invests but the angel fund may not invest in any enterprise if any one angel fund investor owns directly or indirectly more than forty-nine percent of the ownership interests in the enterprise. The angel fund may not invest in an enterprise if any one partner, shareholder, or member of a passthrough entity that directly or indirectly owns more than forty-nine percent of the ownership interests in the enterprise.

Investors in one angel fund may not receive more than five million dollars in aggregate credits under this section during the life of the angel fund but this provision may not be interpreted to limit additional investments in that angel fund.

A passthrough entity entitled to the credit under this section must be considered to be the taxpayer for purposes of this section, and the amount of the credit allowed must be determined at the passthrough entity level.

The tax commissioner may adopt rules to establish necessary administrative provisions for the credit under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 18, § 42; 2009, ch. 545, § 20; 2009, ch. 547, § 1; 2011, ch. 461, § 1; 2013, ch. 443, § 21; 2013, ch. 451, § 1; 2013, ch. 449, § 9; 2017 ch. 399, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2016.